Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.424

Drug take-back program—Repeal.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1422-S2.SL) ***

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective January 1, 2030:

(1) RCW 69.48.010 and 2021 c 155 s 1 & 2018 c 196 s 1;

(2) RCW 69.48.020 and 2018 c 196 s 2;

(3) RCW 69.48.030 and 2018 c 196 s 3;

(4) RCW 69.48.040 and 2018 c 196 s 4;

(5) RCW 69.48.050 and 2021 c 155 s 3 & 2018 c 196 s 5;

(6) RCW 69.48.060 and [2021 c 65 s 64 &] 2018 c 196 s 6;

(7) RCW 69.48.070 and 2021 c 155 s 4 & 2018 c 196 s 7;

(8) RCW 69.48.080 and 2018 c 196 s 8;

(9) RCW 69.48.090 and 2018 c 196 s 9;

(10) RCW 69.48.100 and 2018 c 196 s 10;

(11) RCW 69.48.110 and 2018 c 196 s 11;

(12) RCW 69.48.120 and 2021 c 155 s 5 & 2018 c 196 s 12;

(13) RCW 69.48.130 and 2018 c 196 s 13;

(14) RCW 69.48.140 and 2018 c 196 s 14;

(15) RCW 69.48.150 and 2018 c 196 s 15;

(16) RCW 69.48.160 and 2018 c 196 s 16;

(17) RCW 69.48.170 and 2018 c 196 s 17;

(18) RCW 69.48.180 and 2018 c 196 s 18;

(19) RCW 69.48.190 and 2018 c 196 s 19; and

(20) RCW 69.48.200 and 2018 c 196 s 20.

[ 2021 c 155 s 7; 2018 c 196 s 27.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 155: See note following RCW 69.48.010.